Louisiana, session 2026, SB326.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2150.1(3) through (24), 2152(A)(2), 2155(G)(3), 2156(K)(3), (M),
and (N), 2156.1(B)(1) and (D) through (J), 2156.2(B)(2), 2157(A)(15)(b), (17), and (18),
2158(C) and (E), 2159.1, and 2164(A), (B), and (I) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 37:21(B)(12) and (13), 2150.1(25) through (29), 2152(A)(3), 2155(G)(6) and (7),
2156(A)(3), 2156.1(K), 2156.2(C), 2156.4(D), 2158(A)(24) through (27) and (G), 2163.1,
and 2164(L) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
§21. Limitations on disciplinary proceedings by professional or occupational boards
and commissions
* * *
B. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to the following:
* * *
(12) Louisiana State Licensing Board for Contractors.
(13) Louisiana State Uniform Construction Code Commission.
* * *
§2150.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
(3) "Commercial construction" means the construction of commercial
projects or commercial projects or structures intended for commercial or public
use.
(4) "Contract" means an agreement to perform a scope of work that is
regulated by this Chapter. The project value includes the entire cost of the labor,
materials, rentals, and all direct and indirect project expenses. The cost of materials,
rentals, and direct and indirect expenses shall be included regardless of who pays the
costs or if they are donated. The "principal contract" is the agreement to perform the
entire scope of work for a construction project.
(4)(5)(a) "Contractor" means any person who undertakes to, attempts to, or
submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend, oversee, direct,
perform, or in any manner assume charge of the construction, alteration, repair,
improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, furnishing labor, or
furnishing labor together with material or equipment, or installing material or
equipment for any of the following:
(i) Any building, highway, road, railroad, sewer, grading, excavation,
pipeline, public utility structure, project development, housing, or housing
development, improvement, or any other construction undertaking for which the
project value is fifty thousand dollars or more when the property is to be used for
Page 2 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
commercial purposes.
(ii) Any new residential structure for which the project value is fifty thousand
dollars or more when the property is used for residential purposes.
(iii) Any improvements or repairs to an existing residential structure for
which the project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
(iv) Any mold remediation for which the project value is seven thousand five
hundred dollars or more.
(b) The term "contractor" includes persons who receive an additional fee for
the employment or direction of labor, or any other work beyond the normal
architectural or engineering services.
(c) A contractor holding a license in the major classification of hazardous
materials, or any subclassifications thereunder, is defined in terms of work
performed for which the project value is one dollar or more.
(d) "Contractor" does not mean any person, supplier, manufacturer, or
employee of such person who assembles, repairs, maintains, moves, puts up, tears
down, or disassembles any patented or proprietary equipment supplied by such
person to a contractor to be used solely by the contractor for a construction
undertaking. "Proprietary" means specific and specialized equipment installation,
manufacturing processes, used, or components that are protected from disclosure to
third parties by the owner or manufacturer of the equipment.
(5)(6) "Controlled access" means the complete building or facility area under
direct physical control within which an unauthorized person is denied access.
(7) "Dwelling unit" means a single residential unit that provides
complete, independent residential living facilities for one or more persons,
where occupancy is primarily permanent in nature, including permanent
provisions for separate living.
(6)(8) "Electrical contractor" means any person who undertakes to, attempts
to, or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend, oversee,
direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of the construction, alteration,
repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, or furnishing
Page 3 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
labor together with material and equipment, or installing the same for the wiring,
fixtures, or appliances for the supply of electricity to any residential, commercial, or
other project, for which the project value is ten thousand dollars or more. This
Paragraph is not deemed or construed to limit the authority of a contractor, general
contractor, or residential contractor, as those terms are defined in this Section, nor
to require such individuals to become an electrical contractor.
(7)(9) "Employee" means a worker whose employer person whose employer
is required by law to deducts deduct taxes from his wages and reports report his
annual earnings to the Internal Revenue Service using a W-2 form.
(8)(10) "Executive director" means the person appointed by the board to
serve as the chief operating officer in connection with the day-to-day operation of
the board's business. The executive director is the appointing authority for all
employees of the board.
(9)(11)(a) "General contractor" means a person who contracts directly with
the owner. The term "general contractor" includes the term "primary contractor" and
wherever used in this Chapter or in regulations promulgated thereunder "primary
contractor" means "general contractor".
(b) "General contractor" does not mean any person, supplier, manufacturer,
or employee of such person who assembles, repairs, maintains, moves, puts up, tears
down, or disassembles any patented or proprietary equipment supplied by such
person to a contractor to be used solely by the contractor for a construction
undertaking.
(10)(12) "Home improvement" means the reconstruction, alteration,
renovation, repair, modernization, conversion, improvement, removal, or demolition,
or the construction of an addition to any preexisting residential structure which
building is used or designed to be used as a residence or dwelling unit, or to
structures which are adjacent to such residence or building for which the project
value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more. "Home improvement " does
not include services rendered gratuitously.
(11)(13) "Home improvement contractor" means any person who undertakes
Page 4 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
or attempts to undertake or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise,
superintend, oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of a home
improvement project for which the project value is at least seven thousand five
hundred dollars but less than fifty thousand dollars. A home improvement contractor
shall not perform any structural work that is integral to the structural integrity of any
new or existing structure, including but not limited to footings, foundations, outside
walls, skeleton, bearing columns and interior load bearing walls, floor slabs, or
roofing systems to any type.
(12)(14) "License" means any form of license or registration the board is
authorized to issue in accordance with this Chapter.
(15) "Manufactured home" and "manufactured housing" means a
factory-built residential dwelling unit constructed to standards and codes, as
promulgated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development (HUD), under the National Manufactured Housing Construction
and Safety Standards Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq., as amended. The
terms "manufactured home" and "manufactured housing" may be used
interchangeably and apply to structures bearing the permanently affixed seal
of the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(13)(16) "Mechanical contractor" means any person who undertakes to,
attempts to, or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend,
oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of the construction,
alteration, repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, or
furnishing labor, or furnishing labor together with material and equipment, or
installing the same for the construction, installation, maintenance, testing, and repair
of air conditioning, refrigeration, heating systems, and plumbing for all residential,
commercial, and industrial applications as well as ventilation systems, mechanical
work controls, boilers and other pressure vessels, steam and hot water systems and
piping, gas piping and fuel storage, and chilled water and condensing water systems
and piping, including but not limited to any type of industrial process piping and
related valves, fittings, and components, for which the project value is ten thousand
Page 5 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
dollars or more. A mechanical contractor who performs plumbing work for
which the project value is ten thousand dollars or more shall possess a master
plumber license issued by the State Plumbing Board of Louisiana. This
Paragraph is not deemed or construed to limit the authority of a contractor, general
contractor, or residential contractor, as those terms are defined in this Section, nor
to require such individuals to become a mechanical contractor.
(17) "Mega project" means a commercial construction project for which
the project value is five hundred million dollars or more, or a broadband
project administered in accordance with the Broadband Equity, Access, and
Deployment (BEAD) Program issued by the National Telecommunications and
Information Administration of the United States Department of Commerce.
(18) "Modular home" and "modular housing" means a factory-built
residential dwelling unit built to the International Residential Code as adopted
by the Louisiana State Uniform Construction Code Council.
(14)(19) "Mold remediation contractor" means any person who engages in
removal, cleaning, sanitizing, demolition, or other treatment, including preventative
activities, of mold or mold-contaminated matter that was not purposely grown at that
location for which the project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
Mold remediation applies only to the regulation of mold-related activities that affect
indoor air quality and does not apply to routine cleaning when not conducted for the
purpose of mold-related activities intended to affect indoor air quality.
(15)(20) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, association,
cooperative, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or
any other entity recognized by Louisiana law; and whether or not acting as a
principal, trustee, fiduciary, receiver, or as any other kind of legal or personal
representative, or as a successor in interest, assignee, agent, factor, servant,
employee, director, officer, or any other representative of such person; or any state
or local governing authority or political subdivision.
(16)(21) "Plumbing contractor" means any person who installs, maintains,
and repairs potable and nonpotable tap water or sewer systems within for a building
Page 6 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
structure or residential structure, including service lines, for which the project value
is ten thousand dollars or more.
(17)(22) "Principal" means an owner, shareholder, or an officer or director
of a corporation; a member or manager of a limited liability company; a general
partner of a partnership; a sole proprietor; a trustee; or a full-time employee with
similar operational control or significant influence with respect to any person as
determined by the board.
(18)(23) "Qualifying party" means a natural person designated by the
contractor to represent the contractor for the purpose of complying with the
provisions of this Chapter including but not limited to meeting the requirements for
the initial license and any continuation thereof.
(19)(24)(a) "Residential contractor" means any person who constructs a fixed
building or structure for sale or use by another as a residence or who, for a price,
commission, fee, wage, or other compensation, undertakes or offers to undertake the
construction or superintending of the construction of any residential structure which
is not more than three floors in height, to be used by another as a residence, for
which the project value is fifty thousand dollars or more. The term "residential
contractor" includes all persons who receive an additional fee for the employment
or direction of labor, or any other work beyond the normal architectural or
engineering services.
(b) "Residential contractor" includes both of the following:
(i) Any person bidding or performing home improvement for which the
project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more.
(ii) Any person performing the installation of a modular home with a value
equal to or greater than fifty thousand dollars for which the total project value shall
not include the cost of the component parts of the modular home in the condition
each part leaves the factory pursuant to R.S. 40:1730.71.
(c) "Residential contractor" does not include any person engaged in building
residential structures that are built to the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development's construction standards for manufactured housing as outlined
Page 7 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
at 42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq., or mounted on a metal chassis and wheels.
(20)(25) "Residential roofing" means the construction, alteration, repair,
improvement, demolition, putting up, tearing down, furnishing labor, or furnishing
labor together with materials or equipment, or the installation of materials or
equipment for any phase of roofing specific to a residential structure for which the
project value is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more. For the purposes of
residential roofing only, any structure or building that is primarily used as a
residence with no more than four separate dwellings incorporated into one
structure shall be considered a residential roofing project and subject to the
same licensure requirements.
(21)(26) "Residential roofing contractor" means any person who undertakes
to, attempts to, or submits a price or bid, or offers to construct, supervise,
superintend, oversee, direct, perform, or in any manner assume charge of a
residential roofing project for which the project value is seven thousand five hundred
dollars or more.
(22)(27) "Residential structure" means a building or structure that is used
primarily for occupancy by a person as a residence. Such structures or buildings
include but are not limited to single family dwellings and duplexes which are not
more than three floors in height and structures that are part of or adjacent to the
building or structures to be used as a residence. A residential structure more than
three floors in height may be built by a person holding a building construction and
residential construction license.
(23)(28) "Subcontract" means an agreement to perform a portion of the scope
of work contained in the principal contract including the entire cost of labor and
materials of that part of the principal contract which is performed by the
subcontractor.
(24)(29)(a) "Subcontractor" means a person who contracts to perform a scope
of work that is a part of the scope of work contained in the principal contract.
(b) "Subcontractor" does not include any person, supplier, or manufacturer
who assembles, repairs, maintains, moves, puts up, tears down, or disassembles any
Page 8 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
patented or proprietary equipment supplied by such person to a contractor to be used
solely by the contractor for a construction undertaking.
* * *
§2152. Domicile; officers
A. * * *
(2) Meetings of the board shall be subject to the Open Meetings Law. The
board may hold regular or special meetings outside of Baton Rouge at a location
within the state after proper notice has been provided to the public. Meetings outside
of Baton Rouge shall be held at a meeting space located in a public building and
open to the public for the purposes of the meeting. At least a majority of the regular
monthly meetings of the board each year shall be held in Baton Rouge.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, all meetings of the board shall
be conducted in accordance with Robert's Rules of Order.
* * *
§2155. Residential Contractors Subcommittee; membership; terms; powers; duties
* * *
G. Subject to the approval of the board, the residential subcommittee has all
of the following powers and duties:
* * *
(3) To prescribe and adopt regulations and policies for continuing education.
However, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the residential
subcommittee shall not approve for use by licensees any continuing education
courses or written training programs provided by a member of the board or a
member of the residential subcommittee or legal entity in which he has a controlling
interest.
* * *
(6)(a) If the board receives a complaint that is based on a license or rule
violation, no proceeding may be instituted after five years from the date of the
act or omission. This period may be interrupted by the filing of procedural
motions or suspended as provided in this Paragraph.
Page 9 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
(b) The time period provided in this Paragraph shall be suspended
during the pendency of a legal action involving the licensee as a party or witness
if the complaint arises from the same facts giving rise to the legal action or
arises from the licensee's activities in the legal action.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Paragraph, in the event the
board finds that the public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires
emergency action, the board may take emergency action and issue a summary
suspension in accordance with R.S. 49:977.3(C). For the purposes of this
Paragraph, "legal action" includes litigation, arbitration, mediation, an
administrative proceeding, or any other disciplinary proceeding.
(7) The board shall use special counsel to conduct disciplinary
proceedings and prosecute violations at regular or special meetings whenever
deemed necessary and shall also use special hearing officers at the board's
discretion. These proceedings shall be in accordance with R.S. 49:975 et seq.
The provisions of this Paragraph shall not limit the special counsel to only
matters of a disciplinary proceeding provided the board's general counsel shall
not prosecute cases.
§2156. Applications; licenses; fees; renewals
A. * * *
(3) Failure to meet all requirements of licensure shall result in denial of
the application of an applicant or any principal. An applicant may appeal the
denial in the following order:
(a) An applicant shall first appeal the denial to the board upon written
request at the next regular meeting of the board.
(b) Following the final decision of the board pursuant to Subparagraph
(a) of this Paragraph, an applicant may appeal the final decision of the board
by filing a petition within thirty days of the final decision or order in the
Nineteenth Judicial District Court.
* * *
K. * * *
Page 10 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
(3) Any and all funds collected pursuant to this Subsection shall be disbursed
to the accredited public university or community college schools of construction
management or construction technology by October first of each year upon
completion of the annual audit of the board, less a two percent administrative fee
to be retained by the board. The funds shall be used by the accredited public
university or community college schools of construction management or construction
technology solely for the benefit of their program and the expenditure of such funds
shall be approved by the industry advisory council or board for the program. The
funds collected pursuant to this Subsection shall be in addition to any other monies
received by such schools and are intended to supplement and not replace, displace,
or supplant any other funds received from the state or from any other source. Any
school of construction management or construction technology that experiences a
decrease in the funding appropriated to them by the accredited public university or
community college as determined by the industry advisory council or board for the
program shall be ineligible for participation under the provisions of this Subsection,
and the monies from the fund for such school of construction management or
construction technology shall be redistributed on a pro rata basis to all other
accredited and eligible schools.
* * *
M. No license shall be issued to any domestic or foreign entity required to be
registered with the secretary of state which does not hold a certificate of authority
to do business in this state and is in good standing.
N. Except for the licenses, fees, and assessments authorized by this Chapter,
and except for the occupational license taxes authorized by the constitution and laws
of this state, and except for permit fees charged by parishes and municipalities for
inspection purposes, and except for licenses required by parishes and municipalities
for the purpose of determining the competency of mechanical, electrical, or
plumbing contractors, or both, and electrical contractors, no contractor shall be liable
for any fee or license as a condition of engaging in the contracting business.
§2156.1. Requirements for issuance of a license
Page 11 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
* * *
B.(1) An applicant and a qualifying party for a license or registration shall
be a United States citizen or legal resident of the United States. An applicant
shall submit a financial statement on a form supplied by the board, current to within
twelve months of the date of filing the application, prepared and signed by an
accountant, bookkeeper, or certified public accountant and signed by the applicant,
attesting the statement is true and correct. In lieu of a signature by a certified public
accountant on the board's form, a current financial statement prepared by a certified
public accountant may be attached.
* * *
D. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, criminal
background information in the possession of the State Licensing Board for
Contractors shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person
outside of the agency, except as necessary for action on the application of the
applicant. However, any such record may be released to the public in an
administrative proceeding before the board, and any final determination made
by the board relative to the fitness of any person to receive or to continue to
hold a license issued by the board and any legal ground upon which such
determination is based shall be a public record as provided by R.S. 44:4(51).
The provisions of this Subsection shall not be construed to interfere or limit the
jurisdiction and oversight of the legislative auditor or the inspector general
E.(1) An applicant for licensure shall designate a qualifying party for each
classification and for the Louisiana business and law requirement. The qualifying
party shall meet all application requirements and shall satisfy any examination and
credential requirement. When the qualifying party is no longer associated with
the license, the board shall be notified within thirty days of the disassociation,
and another qualifying party shall qualify within sixty days.
* * *
E.F.(1) Residential construction and its subclassifications, mold remediation,
and home improvement applicants shall be required to submit certificates evidencing
Page 12 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
workers' compensation coverage in compliance with Title 23 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, and liability insurance in a minimum amount of one five
hundred thousand dollars or liability protection provided by a liability trust fund as
authorized by R.S. 22:46(9)(d) in a minimum amount of one five hundred thousand
dollars.
(2) Proof of insurance coverage shall be provided by an agent, broker,
or insurance company showing the name of the licensee, the name of the
insurance company, the name and address of the insurance broker, the
insurance policy number, the beginning and ending insurance coverage dates,
no exclusions for the licensee's scopes of work for which he is licensed, and the
board that is listed as a certificate holder.
(3) Coverage shall be for a minimum of six months and shall include all
scopes of work for which an applicant is licensed to perform.
(4) The policy shall list the board as a certificate holder.
F.(1)G.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any
residential home improvement or mold remediation licensee in good standing with
the board for not less than one consecutive year may apply to transfer the license to
an inactive status.
(2) An inactive licensee shall follow the same renewal requirements as an
active licensee as provided in this Chapter, including the payment of fees, with the
exception of the submission of current insurance certificates.
(3) An inactive licensee shall be required to fulfill all prescribed continuing
education requirements established for active licensees.
(4) A licensee may request transfer from inactive status to active status at any
time, if:
(a) The inactive license has been renewed as provided for in this Section.
(b) The inactive license is current at the time the request is received by the
board.
(c) The licensee submits the required insurance certificates as provided in
Subsection E of this Section.
Page 13 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
G.H. Before a license is issued, a mold remediation license applicant shall
be required to furnish evidence to the board that he has satisfactorily completed at
least twenty-four hours of training in mold remediation and basic mold assessment.
H.(1)I.(1) Mechanical, plumbing, and electrical contractors licensed pursuant
to the provisions of this Section are excluded from local, municipal, or parish
regulatory authority examination procedures and may bid and perform work within
any local jurisdiction upon paying all appropriate fees.
(2) The purpose of this Subsection is to preempt local, municipal, or parish
regulatory examination authority for statewide-licensed mechanical, plumbing, or
electrical contractors bidding and performing work in multiple jurisdictions. The
preemption shall further exclude the employees of statewide-licensed electrical and
mechanical contractors from local, municipal, or parish regulatory examination or
certification authority as a condition to performing work for the statewide-licensed
electrical or mechanical contractor.
I.(1)J.(1) Any plumbing contractor who currently holds a Master Plumber
License from the State Plumbing Board of Louisiana shall be exempt from any trade
examination requirement.
(2) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to permit plumbing contractors
to perform plumbing work without first complying with the licensure provisions of
Chapter 16 of this Title, R.S. 37:1361 et seq.
J.K. The board may consolidate, add, or remove subclassifications or
specialties by rule as it deems appropriate.
§2156.2. Requirements of a licensee; record keeping; duty to report
* * *
B. A licensee shall have a continuing duty to provide written notification to
the board within thirty calendar days of both of the following:
* * *
(2) Any criminal, civil, or administrative actions instituted or pending in any
jurisdiction against or involving the licensee, qualifying party, or any principal of
the licensee.
Page 14 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
* * *
§2156.4. Residential roofing
* * *
D. For purposes of residential roofing only, any structure or building
used as a residence and containing no more than four separate dwelling units
within a single structure shall be considered a residential roofing project and
shall be subject to the same licensure requirements.
§2157. Exemptions
A. The provisions of this Part shall not apply to any of the following:
* * *
(15) The following persons are exempt from home improvement licensure:
* * *
(b) Persons licensed as a building construction contractor or residential
contractor.
* * *
(17) Any person performing work as a subcontractor for a residential
construction license holder, except for electrical, mechanical, plumbing, mold
remediation, water wells, asbestos, or hazardous materials scopes of work. The
subcontractor shall contract directly with the residential license holder.
(18) Any person performing home improvement work for a building
construction license holder, except for electrical, mechanical, plumbing, mold
remediation, asbestos, or hazardous material scopes of work.
(19) Electrical, mechanical, and plumbing licensees who are acting
exclusively within the scope of their classification.
* * *
§2158. Revocation and suspension of licenses; issuance of cease and desist orders;
debarment; violations; penalty; criminal penalty
A. No person may engage in the business of contracting, or act as a contractor
as defined in this Chapter, unless he holds an active license as a contractor in
accordance with the provisions of this Chapter. The board and residential
Page 15 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
subcommittee may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a license; issue cease and
desist orders to stop work; issue fines and penalties; or debar any person licensed
pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter for any of the following violations:
* * *
(24) Failure to comply with the provisions of the Louisiana Underground
Utilities and Facilities Damage Prevention Law, R.S. 40:1749.11 et seq.
(25) Damaging or altering the property of any person with the intent to
induce that person to enter into a contract.
(26) Failure to pay for materials or services rendered in connection with
operating as a contractor when the contractor has received sufficient funds as
payment for the construction work, project, or operation for which the services
or materials were rendered or purchased.
(27) Making a material misrepresentation of fact in any application for
a permit required by state, municipal, or parochial law.
* * *
C. In the event of a revocation of a license or a qualifying party status, the
person or qualifying party shall be ineligible to apply for a license or qualifying party
status for three years following the revocation. Any person applying for a license,
or qualifying party status after expiration of the three years following the
revocation, shall appear before the board for approval of the issuance of a
license or qualifying party status.
* * *
E. Any party to the proceeding who is aggrieved by the action of the board
may appeal the decision in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S.
49:950 et seq. Any party aggrieved by a final decision or order of the board in
an adjudication proceeding may appeal the action of the board by filing a
petition within thirty days of the final decision or order in the Nineteenth
Judicial District Court. Upon request by the aggrieved party for a stay of
enforcement or effect of the board's order pending review, the aggrieved party's
request for stay shall be set by the court for hearing with no less than ten days
Page 16 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
prior written notice to the board or the attorney representing the board. After
hearing the request for stay, the court shall determine whether to stay the final
order or decision of the board pending review of the appeal. Upon making its
determination, the court shall then enter an order accordingly.
* * *
G.(1) All documents and records of any applicant or licensee and all
investigative material regarding any alleged violations or violations of any
licensee shall be exempt from production under the Public Records Laws,
pursuant to R.S. 44:1 et seq., except when introduced as evidence in an
administrative hearing held by the board.
(2) The board's staff shall produce and publish the names, addresses,
contact information, and license information of all current licensees.
* * *
§2159.1. Contracting; prohibited acts; property insurance
A. The following acts are prohibited by persons performing contracting
services:
(1) Interpreting insurance policy provisions regarding coverage or duties
under an insured's property insurance policy or advertising or soliciting such
services. A contractor shall be considered to have violated the provisions of this
Paragraph if a person working on behalf of the contractor including but not limited
to a compensated employee or a nonemployee who is compensated by the contractor
violates the provisions of this Paragraph.
(2) Adjusting a property insurance claim on behalf of an insured as a public
adjuster, as defined in R.S. 22:1692, or advertising or soliciting such services. A
contractor shall be considered to have violated the provisions of this Paragraph if a
person working on behalf of the contractor, including but not limited to a
compensated employee or a nonemployee who is compensated by the contractor,
violates the provisions of this Paragraph.
(3) Providing an insured with an agreement authorizing remediation, repairs,
or construction without prior to and without first providing a good faith estimate
Page 17 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
of the itemized and detailed costs of services and materials for remediation, repairs,
or construction to be undertaken pursuant to a an insured property damage claim.
A contractor shall be considered to have violated the provisions of this Paragraph if
a person working on behalf of the contractor including but not limited to a
compensated employee or a nonemployee who is compensated by the contractor
violates the provisions of this Paragraph. A contractor does not violate this Paragraph
if, as a result of the insurer adjusting a claim, the actual cost of repairs differs from
the initial estimate.
(4) Sharing in any legal fee earned by an attorney.
(5) Requiring an insured to sign an attorney representation agreement on
behalf of an attorney.
(6) Accepting a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, regardless
of form or amount, in exchange for a referral by the person or company to an
attorney or law firm.
(7) Advertising or soliciting as insurance claims specialists.
(8) Advertising or soliciting as providing any insurance claim or policy
interpretation related services to an insured.
(9) Assignment of benefits.
B. For the purposes of this Section, "assignment agreement" means any
instrument by which post-loss benefits under a residential or commercial
property insurance policy, including but not limited to any right of action
against the insurer or any proceeds acquired from the insurer, are assigned,
transferred, or otherwise acquired, in whole or in part, to or from a person
providing services, including but not limited to inspecting, protecting, repairing,
restoring, or replacing the property or mitigating against further damage to the
property.
C.(1) No person shall solicit or accept an assignment, in whole or in part,
of any post-loss insurance benefit under a residential or commercial property
insurance policy. Any such assignment agreement shall be against public policy
and void.
Page 18 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
(2) The provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall not apply to
any of the following:
(a) An assignment, transfer, pledge, or conveyance granted to a federally
insured financial institution, mortgagee, or subsequent purchaser of the
property.
(b) Liability coverage under a residential or commercial property
insurance policy.
D. Any violation of Subsection C of this Section shall constitute an unfair
or deceptive trade practice and subject the violator to any action and penalty
pursuant to R.S. 22:1969.
E. The provisions of Civil Code Article 2652 shall not apply to this
Section.
F. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit an attorney from
collecting a contingency fee, pursuant to R.S. 37:218 and the Rules of
Professional Conduct of the Louisiana State Bar Association, for an action
related to a property insurance claim.
* * *
§2163.1. Records and evidence; civil subpoenas
The board's papers, documents, reports, or evidence related to the
subject of an investigation in accordance with this Chapter shall not be subject
to disclosure until the completion of the investigation. Such papers, documents,
reports, or evidence relative to the subject of an investigation in accordance
with this Chapter shall not be subject to subpoena until the investigation has
concluded and any violations have been adjudicated at a hearing before the
board, unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines the agency and the
person who is the subject of the investigation would not be necessarily hindered
by such subpoena. Board personnel shall not be subject to subpoena for a civil
action by any court of this state to testify concerning any matter of which they
have knowledge pursuant to a pending investigation. Nothing in this Section
shall be construed to interfere with or limit the jurisdiction and oversight of the
Page 19 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
legislative auditor or the inspector general.
§2164. Violations; civil penalty; jurisdiction
A. Any person who violates any provision of this Chapter shall, after notice
and a hearing, be liable to the board for a fine of up to ten percent of the total
contract or the value of the work bid or being performed for which there is a
violation. In addition to the fine, the board may impose administrative costs and
attorney fees for each offense. For violations of this Chapter for which a value
cannot be determined or does not apply, the violator shall be liable to the board
for a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars. In addition to the fine, the
board may impose administrative costs and attorney fees for each offense. In
determining the amount of the administrative penalty costs, the board or residential
subcommittee shall consider the efforts expended by the board's staff in
investigating and prosecuting the violation, the circumstances and seriousness of
the violation, cooperation on the part of the contractor, and the history of previous
violations.
B. A monetary penalty assessed by the board or the residential subcommittee
is payable within ninety days or as provided by law. Failure to pay an outstanding
penalty may be cause to deny issuance or renewal of a license or registration or
suspension of license and may be subject to collection efforts as provided by law.
* * *
I. All fines or penalties, except for a four percent administrative fee,
collected by the board pursuant to the provisions of this Section for violations of any
provision of this Chapter shall, annually, at each audit of the board, be transferred
to a separate contractor's educational trust fund to be used for educational purposes
as determined by the trustees of the fund. The Construction Education Trust Fund
shall make an audited financial report to the board annually.
* * *
L. A licensee shall maintain a current email address on file with the
board for purposes of receiving all board correspondence, including but not
limited to notices, actions, and requests for information. Such correspondence
Page 20 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 326 ENROLLED
shall be considered received upon receipt of an email delivery confirmation by
the board.
Section 2. R.S. 37:2157(A)(19) is hereby repealed.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 21 of 21
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.